dictsource/de_rules
        echo       ECo:
     h) ee (_      'e:
     _) e (ff      %E
     l) e (g_      'e:
    kr) e (ier     e:
        eih (_     aI
     _) eil (aP3   'aIl
     _) eil (fP3   'aIl
     _) ein (@P3   _!'aIn
        ein (and   _|%aIn
     _) eine (r@   aIn@
     _) einig      aInIg
     m) eir (_     aI3
     _) eisen (@P5 'aIz@n
     _) e (lek     %e:
     _) elektro (@P7 e:l'Ektro:
     _) elen       e:lEn
   mod) e (l@      E
     s) e (lig     e:
     _) emp (@   %Emp
     _) emph (@    %Emf
     _) emp (ir    %Emp
    br) ems        Ems       // brems-t, not brem-st
     _) ene (rg    %e:nE
     _) energie    e:nErg'i:
     @) en (i      e:n
     @) e (nsi     E
     _) ent (@P3   _|%Ent
     _) enten      Ent@n
     _) ent (er    Ent
   pat) ent        'Ent
     t) en (t      En
    qu) en (tA     En
     &) en (tum    @n
     &) e (nzK     'E
     _) epi (@     ,e:pi:
     _) epi (sk    e:pI
     _) er (@P2    _|%Er
     _) er (gie    Er
     &) er (ig_    @r
     &) er (igst   @r
     _) er (beK    Er
     _) er (HC     Er        //  lC, mC, nC, rC
        er (o_     'e:r
     _) ergeb (nis Erg'e:b
     _) erst (CP4  'Erst
     _) ers (tr+   _|%ErS
     @) er (v      Er
   mod) er (n      Er

     _) entert     _^_EN
        er (dig    e:r
     _) erob (er   %Ero:b
     @) esen (_    e:z@n
     @) ett (_     'Et
        eum (_     'e:Um
    @@) eum (_     =e:Um
     _) eur (op    %OYr
     @) eur (_     'Y:r
        euse (_    'Y:z@
        eusen (_   'Y:z@n
  schl) eu (s      OY
     h) eu (se++   OY


.group f
     _) f (_       Ef
        f          f
     f) f 
     _) f (L01A    f   // allow fl fr  at start of word
     _) f (jord    f

     _) faks (i    f%akz
     _) farb (C@P4 f'arp
     _) farb (l@P4 f'arb
     _) farc       fars
     _) fein (@P4  f'aIn
        fenster	fEnst3
     _) fertig (C@P6 f'ErtIC
     _) fest (@P4  f'Est
     _) flug       fl'u:g
        foto       fo:to:
     _) free       _^_EN
     _) feudal     f%OYdA:l
     _) feuer (@   fOY@r
     _) frev       fre:f
     _) froh (@P4  fr'o:
     _) frohlock   fro:l'Ok
     _) fung (A    fUNg
        fügbar	fy:kbA:r


.group g
     _) g (_       ge:
     _) g (L01A    g  // allow _gl _gr
        g          g
        g (g 
        g (_N      k
        g (L02     k
        g (sA      g
        gd (_N     kt
     _) gh (A      g
     _) g (nA      g@-  // allow _gn
     B) gn (A      g@-n

     i) gt (_      Ct
    ei) gt (_      kt
        gtet (_    kt@t
        gtest      kt@st

     _) g (eHC     g         //  hC, lC, mC, nC, rC

 massa) g          Z
        gabe	gA:b@
     @) ght (_     _^_EN
        gleich	glaIC
        graph      grAf
        graph (_   gr'A:f
        green      _^_EN
        groß	gro:s
        guide      _^_EN
        gue (_     k
     _) güte (@P4  g'y:t@


.group ge
     _) ge (@P2    g@
  ungs) ge (C@     g@
     _) ge (beX    ge:
        geben      ge:b@n
        gebirge (_S7  g@bIrg@
        gedulds    %g@dUlts
     _) gegen (@P5 ge:g@n
        gegen      ge:g@n
        gegn       ge:gn
        gehen      ge:@n
     _) geh (eX    ge:
        gei (+     gaI
     _) ge (imp    g@
        ge (mach   g@
        ge (mal    g@
     _) ge (mK     gE
     _) ge (nK     gE
     _) ge (L01K   gE
        ge (tr     g@
        general    ge:n@r'A:l
        general (is ge:n@ral
     _) ge (ner    gE
     _) geo        g,e:o:
     _) geo (pf    g@'O
     _) ge (orP2   g@
     _) ge (org    g%e:
        ge (rman   gE
        ge (rät    g@
        gestalt	g@Stalt
        ge (strig  gE


.group h
     _) h (_       hA:
        h          h
     h) h 
    ch) h          h

        handbuch	hantbu:x
     _) herab (P5  hEr'ab
     _) heran (P5  hEr'an
     _) herauf (P6 hEr'aUf
     _) heraus (P6 hEr'aUs
     _) herbei (P6 hEr'baI
     _) herein (P6 hEr'aIn
     _) herüber (P7 hEr'y:b3
     _) herum (P5  hEr'Um
     _) herunter (P8 hEr'Unt3
     _) hervor (P6 hErf'o:r
     _) hier (@    h%i:r
     _) hilf (@P4  h'Ilf
     _) hilfs (@P5 h'Ilfs
     _) hilfe (@P5 h'Ilf@

     _) hinab (P5  hIn'ab
     _) hinan (P5  hIn'an
     _) hinauf (P6 hIn'aUf
     _) hinaus (P6 hIn'aUs
     _) hinein (P6 hIn'aIn
     _) hingegen   hIng'e:g@n
     _) hinüber (P7 hIn'y:b3
     _) hinum (P5  hIn'Um
     _) hinunter (P8 hIn'Unt3
     _) hinzu (P5  hInts'u:

     _) hinge (@P5 h'Ing@
     _) hinter (@P6 h,Int3

     _) hand (CP4  h'ant
     _) hand (lung hand
     _) haupt (@@P5 h'aUpt
     _) haus (@P4  h'aUs
 //         @) heit (_S4       haIt
     _) hero       h%e:ro:
     _) herz (er@P4 h'Erts
     _) high       _^_EN
     _) hinter (@  h,Int3
     _) hoch (@P4  h'o:x
        hoch       ho:x
        homogen    h,o:mo:ge:n
     _) hyper (@P5 h'y:p3


.group i
     _) i (_       i:
        i          i:
        ih (+      i:

        i (C%      I
        i (CC      I
        i (sch     I
        i (x       I
        i (ph      i:

     @) i (ng      I
   &CC) i (_       =i:

     @) i (bl_     'i:
     @) i (bel_    'i:
        ib (t_     i:p

     @) i (at_     I
        i (d_      'i:
        i (dee     %i:
        i (erin    =i:
     @) ig (+      Ig#       // [ig] or [iC]
        igh (K     _^_EN
        ine (_	'i:n@
        inen (_	'i:n@n

        i (i       i:_!

        ik (_      Ik
     s) ik (_      'i:k
    br) ik (_      'i:k
    @t) ik (_      =i:k
 polit) ik         'i:k
     @) ik (el_    'i:k

     _) illeg      ,Ile:g
     _) i (llu     %I
     _) i (mag     I
        i (Co_     'i:
        ik (o_     i:k
        i (l_      'i:
     k) i (l_      I
     &) im (o_     =i:m
     r) i (na_     'i:
     _) in (k      %In
     _) inter      Int@r
     &) in (_      i2n
     l) in (_      'i:n
     m) in (_      'i:n
     s) in (_      'i:n
     z) in (_      'i:n
     @) in (o_     'i:n
     @) ion (_     j'o:n
     g) ion (_     i'o:n
     @) io (n      Io:
        io         Io:
     @) is (_      Is
     &) isch (_    =IS
        is (mus_   'Is
        istan	=IstA:n
        istisch (_	'IstIS
     @) ist (_     'Ist
     @) it (_N     'It
     @) ite (_     'i:t@
     @) ität (_S4  i:t'E:t

     &) ium (_     =i:Um
    @s) i (v_      'i:
    @t) i (v_      'i:


.group ie
        ie         i:
        ieh        i:
     @) ie (_      'i:
     @) ie (_$w_alt  =I@

     &) ie (ll_    I'E
     &) ie (r_     'i:
        ie (rs@    'i:
     u) ie (r_     _|'i:
     &) ie (rlich  'i:
  bank) ie (r      I'e:
  barr) ie (r      I'e:
financ) ie (r      I'e:
   arr) ie (r      I'e:
 hotel) ie (r      I'e:
  prem) ie (r      I'e:
   hyg) ie (n      I'e:
  ital) ie (n      I'e:
     d) ienst      i:nst
     r) ien (@     IEn
     &) ien (_     =I@n
    &b) ien (_     =i:@n
    @g) ien (_     'i:@n
    @m) ien (_     'i:@n
    ph) ien (_     'i:@n
    &n) ien (_     I@n
    @p) ien (_     'i:@n
    &r) ien (_     =i:@n
   ser) ien (_     'i:@n
  tter) ien (_     'i:@n
   eor) ien (_     'i:@n
   gor) ien (_     'i:@n
   etr) ien (_     'i:@n
 dustr) ien (_     'i:@n
    @s) ien (_     'i:@n
    @t) ien (_     'i:@n
     &) iens (_    =I;@ns
        ient (_    I'Ent
     d) ient (_     i:nt
     &) ienz (_    I'Ents
   sch) ie (n      i:
     @) ie (reX    'i:
        ierungs    'i:rUNs
        ierung     'i:rUN
bakter) ie         =I@
 famil) ie         =I@
   fer) ie (n      =I@
   fol) ie (_      =I@
formal) ie         =I@
  stud) ie (_      =I@
    in) ie (_      I@


.group j
     _) j (_       jOt
        j          j


.group k
     _) k (_       kA:
        k          k
     _) k (L01A    k   // allow _kl _kr
     _) k (ha      k
     _) k (nA      k   // allow _kn
     k) k 

//          @) keit (_S4    kaIt
//          @) keiten (_S6  kaIt@n

        ka (rtoff  k%a
        ko (e@     ko:
        kolleg     k%Ole:g
     _) komme (C@  k%OmE
     _) ko (mp     k%O
     _) ko (mpost  kO
     _) ko (n@     k%O
     _) ko (nter   kO


.group l
     _) l (_       El
        l          l
     l) l 

        lady       _^_EN
     _) land (C@P4 l'ant
     _) landes (@P6 l'and@s
     &) ländisch	l,EndIS
     _) lang (C@P4 l'aN
     _) lang (t@   l'aN
        langsam    l'aNzA:m
     _) leb (C     le:p
     _) leb (C@@P3 'le:p
     _) leben (dig le:b'En
     _) lehr (C@P4 l'e:r
     _) leit (@P4  l'aIt
        leitung	laItUN
     _) lern (@@P4 l'Ern
     _) lexi (@    lEksi:
     &) lich (_S4  l2IC   // [l2] means devoice previous consonant
     &) liche (_S5 l2IC@
     &) lichem (_S6 l2IC@m
     &) lichen (_S6 l2IC@n
     &) licher (_S6 l2IC3
     &) liches (_S6 l2IC@s
     &) lichere (_S7 l2IC@r@
     &) licherem (_S8 l2IC@r@m
     &) licheren (_S8 l2IC@r@n
     &) licherer (_S8 l2IC@r@3
     &) licheres (_S8 l2IC@r@s
     &) lichste (_S7 l2ICst@
     &) lichstem (_S8 l2ICst@m
     &) lichsten (_S8 l2ICst@n
     &) lichster (_S8 l2ICst@r
     &) lichstes (_S8 l2ICst@s
     &) lichkeit (_S8 l2ICkaIt
     &) lichung (_S7 l2IC%UN
        load	_^_EN
     @) lo (gisch  l'o:
        dia) log	lo:g
     _) luft (CP4  l'Uft

.group m
     _) m (_       Em
        m          m
     m) m 

        manager    mEnIdZ3r
     _) manch      manC    // for 'manchen'
        marine     mA:r'i:n@
     _) meß (@P3   m'Es
        meldung	m,EldUN
     _) menag      m%e:nA:Z
     _) met (all   m%e:t
     _) meth       m%e:t
        meter      m'e:t3
     _) metro (@P5 m,e:tro:
     _) micro      _^_EN
     _) miet (C@P4 m'i:t
     _) mikro (@P5 m,i:kro:
     _) mit (P3    m'It
        mitt       mIt
        mitt (eil  mItt
     _) m (nem     m   // allow _mnem
     _) mo (rb     m%O
     _) mono (@    m,o:no:
     _) motor      m'o:to:r
     _) ms         _^_EN
        musik      m%u:zi:k

.group n
     _) n (_       En
        n          n
     n) n 
        ng         N
     o) ng (e      ng
     o) ng (A      Ng
     u) ng (i      Ng
        ng (r      Ng
        nk         Nk
        nk (A      nk
    fu) nk         Nk

     _) natur (C@P5  nA:t'u:r
     _) na (tür    n%A:
        nce (_     _^_EN
        nces (_    _^_EN
     _) ne (b      ne:
        nebeneina (nd n,e:b@n_|aIn'a
     _) neben (@P5 n'e:b@n
     _) ne (g      ne:
        neglig     ne:gli:Z
        neglige    ne:gli:Z
     &) ness (_N   _^_EN
        new        _^_EN
        nieder     ni:d3
        nord (L04st n%Ort
        nord (west n%Ort
        notwend	no:tvEnd
        nuance     ny:'A~s@

.group o
     _) o (_       o:
        o          o:
        oh (+      o:
        oo         o:
        oe         Y:
        oe (CC     W
        ou         u:

        o (C%      O
        o (CC      O
        o (sch     O
        o (x       O
        o (ph      o:
   &CC) o (_       =o:
        o (Co_     'o:
        o (lo_     o:

        ob (t_     o:p
        og (t_     o:k

     _) ober (@P4  _|,o:b3
     _) ober (eX   o:b@r
     _) ober (ste  o:b3
     _) ob (jek    %Op
     _) obst (reP4 'o:pst
        oe (_      o:@
     @) oen (_S1   n
    _n) o (e       o:
     @) o (g_      'o:
     t) ogen (_    o:g'e:n
     @) o (gin_    'o:
        o (l_      'o:
        o (lsam    o:
        o (m_      'o:
    @A) o (n_      'o:
        one (_     'o:n@
        onen (_    'o:n@n
  zitr) on         'o:n
     @) oo (_      u:
     r) oo (m      u:
     z) oo (m      u:
    &t) or (_      =o:r
        orches     OrkEs
     &) oren (_    'o:r@n
     _) orts (@P4  'Orts
        oso (_     'o:zo:
     _) oster      'o:st@r
    st) o (ss      o:
        oy (K      OY



.group p
     _) p (_       pe:
        p          p
     p) p
     _) p (L01A    p     // allow _pl _pr
     _) pf (A      pF
     _) pf (L01A   pF    // allow _pfl _pfr
     _) ph (A      f     // allow _ph
     _) ph (L01A   f     // allow _phl _phr
     _) phth (A    ft
        ph         f
     _) p (neu     p     // allow _pneu
     _) p (sA      p     // allow _ps
     _) p (tol     p
